Nevada, session 83, AB525.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 482 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, the
Department may issue special license plates and registration
certificates to residents of Nevada for any antique kei vehicle if the
antique kei vehicle is covered by insurance that meets the
requirements of NRS 485.185 and that:
(a) Is designed or designated specifically for an antique
vehicle; or
(b) Includes an endorsement designed or designated
specifically for antique vehicles.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, any vehicle
issued special license plates and a registration certificate pursuant
to subsection 1 shall not be used for general transportation but
may be used for:
(a) Club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades or similar
activities; and
-
*AB525*

– 3 –
(b) Such other uses as are necessary for the operation and
maintenance of the vehicle.
3. A vehicle that complies with subsection 2 is exempt from
the provisions of NRS 445B.770 to 445B.815, inclusive.
4. If the owner of the vehicle elects to use the vehicle for
general transportation, he or she:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2655, shall not be
issued special license plates and a registration certificate pursuant
to subsection 1; and
(b) Shall comply with the provisions of NRS 445B.770 to
445B.815, inclusive.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, license plates
issued pursuant to this section must be inscribed with the words
“Antique Kei Vehicle” and a number of characters, including
numbers and letters, as determined necessary by the Director
pursuant to NRS 482.367003.
6. A person may request personalized prestige license plates
issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to be combined with a special
license plate issued pursuant to subsection 5 if the person pays the
fees for the personalized prestige license plates in addition to the
fees required pursuant to this section.
7. If, during the registration period, the holder of special
license plates issued pursuant to this section disposes of the
vehicle to which the plates are affixed, the holder shall retain the
plates and:
(a) Affix them to another vehicle which meets the
requirements of this section and report the change to the
Department in accordance with the procedure set forth for other
transfers; or
(b) Within 30 days after removing the plates from the vehicle,
return them to the Department.
8. The fee for the special license plates is $35, in addition to
all other applicable registration and license fees and governmental
services taxes. The fee for an annual renewal sticker is $10.
9. In addition to the fees required pursuant to subsection 8,
the Department shall charge and collect a fee for the first issuance
of the special license plates for those motor vehicles exempted
pursuant to subsection 3 from the provisions of NRS 445B.770 to
445B.815, inclusive. The amount of the fee must be equal to the
amount of the fee for a form certifying emission control
compliance set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of
NRS 445B.830.
10. Fees paid to the Department pursuant to subsection 9
must be accounted for in the Pollution Control Account created by
NRS 445B.830.
-
*AB525*

– 4 –
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Antique kei vehicle” means a motor vehicle that:
(1) Is powered by an internal combustion engine with a
displacement of 660 cubic centimeters or less;
(2) Is 60 inches or less in width;
(3) Is 135 inches or less in length;
(4) Is designed to travel with four wheels in contact with the
ground;
(5) Has an enclosed passenger cab;
(6) Was imported into the United States; and
(7) Is at least 25 years old.
(b) “General transportation” means a vehicle that is:
(1) Driven more than 5,000 miles in the immediately
preceding year; or
(2) Used in any capacity for commercial purposes.
Sec. 2. NRS 482.216 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.216 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2155,
upon the request of a new vehicle dealer, the Department may
authorize the new vehicle dealer to:
(a) Accept applications for the registration of the new motor
vehicles he or she sells and the related fees and taxes;
(b) Issue certificates of registration to applicants who satisfy the
requirements of this chapter; and
(c) Accept applications for the transfer of registration pursuant
to NRS 482.399 if the applicant purchased from the new vehicle
dealer a new vehicle to which the registration is to be transferred.
2. A new vehicle dealer who is authorized to issue certificates
of registration pursuant to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Transmit the applications received to the Department within
the period prescribed by the Department;
(b) Transmit the fees collected from the applicants and properly
account for them within the period prescribed by the Department;
(c) Comply with the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection
5; and
(d) Bear any cost of equipment which is necessary to issue
certificates of registration, including any computer hardware or
software.
3. A new vehicle dealer who is authorized to issue certificates
of registration pursuant to subsection 1 shall not:
(a) Charge any additional fee for the performance of those
services;
(b) Receive compensation from the Department for the
performance of those services;
(c) Accept applications for the renewal of registration of a motor
vehicle; or
-
*AB525*

– 5 –
(d) Accept an application for the registration of a motor vehicle
if the applicant wishes to:
(1) Obtain special license plates pursuant to NRS 482.3667
to 482.3823, inclusive [;] , and section 1 of this act; or
(2) Claim the exemption from the governmental services tax
provided pursuant to NRS 361.1565 to veterans and their relations.
4. The provisions of this section do not apply to the registration
of a moped pursuant to NRS 482.2155.
5. The Director shall adopt such regulations as are necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section. The regulations adopted
pursuant to this subsection must provide for:
(a) The expedient and secure issuance of license plates and
decals by the Department; and
(b) The withdrawal of the authority granted to a new vehicle
dealer pursuant to subsection 1 if that dealer fails to comply with the
regulations adopted by the Department.
Sec. 3. NRS 482.2655 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.2655 1. If, with respect to a motor vehicle that is
required to comply with the provisions of NRS 445B.700 to
445B.815, inclusive, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
an authorized inspection station or authorized station tests the
emissions from the motor vehicle and the motor vehicle fails the
emissions test, the Department shall not issue a special license plate
for that vehicle pursuant to NRS 482.381, 482.3812, 482.3814 or
482.3816 or section 1 of this act for a period of 90 days after the
motor vehicle fails the emissions test.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Authorized inspection station” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 445B.710.
(b) “Authorized station” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 445B.720.
(c) “Fails the emissions test” means that a motor vehicle does
not comply with the applicable provisions of NRS 445B.700 to
445B.815, inclusive, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
Sec. 4. NRS 482.274 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.274 1. The Director shall order the preparation of vehicle
license plates for trailers in the same manner provided for motor
vehicles in NRS 482.270, except that a vehicle license plate
prepared for a full trailer or semitrailer that is registered pursuant to
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 is not required to have displayed upon
it the month and year the registration expires.
2. The Director shall order preparation of two sizes of vehicle
license plates for trailers. The smaller plates may be used for trailers
with a gross vehicle weight of less than 1,000 pounds.
-
*AB525*

– 6 –
3. The Director shall determine the registration numbers
assigned to trailers.
4. Any license plates issued for a trailer before July 1, 1975,
bearing a different designation from that provided for in this section,
are valid during the period for which such plates were issued.
5. The Department shall not issue for a full trailer or semitrailer
that is registered pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 482.483 a special
license plate available pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to 482.3823,
inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 5. NRS 482.399 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.399 1. Upon the transfer of the ownership of or interest
in any vehicle by any holder of a valid registration, or upon
destruction of the vehicle, the registration expires.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 482.2155 and
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483, the holder of the original registration
may transfer the registration to another vehicle to be registered by
the holder and use the same regular license plate or plates or special
license plate or plates issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667 to
482.3823, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, or 482.384, on the
vehicle from which the registration is being transferred, if the
license plate or plates are appropriate for the second vehicle, upon
filing an application for transfer of registration and upon paying the
transfer registration fee and the excess, if any, of the registration fee
and governmental services tax on the vehicle to which the
registration is transferred over the total registration fee and
governmental services tax paid on all vehicles from which he or she
is transferring ownership or interest. Except as otherwise provided
in NRS 482.294, an application for transfer of registration must be
made in person, if practicable, to any office or agent of the
Department or to a registered dealer, and the license plate or plates
may not be used upon a second vehicle until registration of that
vehicle is complete.
3. In computing the governmental services tax, the
Department, its agent or the registered dealer shall credit the portion
of the tax paid on the first vehicle attributable to the remainder of
the current registration period or calendar year on a pro rata monthly
basis against the tax due on the second vehicle or on any other
vehicle of which the person is the registered owner. If any person
transfers ownership or interest in two or more vehicles, the
Department or the registered dealer shall credit the portion of the tax
paid on all of the vehicles attributable to the remainder of the
current registration period or calendar year on a pro rata monthly
basis against the tax due on the vehicle to which the registration is
transferred or on any other vehicle of which the person is the
registered owner. The certificates of registration and unused license
-
*AB525*

– 7 –
plates of the vehicles from which a person transfers ownership or
interest must be submitted before credit is given against the tax due
on the vehicle to which the registration is transferred or on any other
vehicle of which the person is the registered owner.
4. In computing the registration fee, the Department or its
agent or the registered dealer shall credit the portion of the
registration fee paid on each vehicle attributable to the remainder of
the current calendar year or registration period on a pro rata basis
against the registration fee due on the vehicle to which registration
is transferred.
5. If the amount owed on the registration fee or governmental
services tax on the vehicle to which registration is transferred is less
than the credit on the total registration fee or governmental services
tax paid on all vehicles from which a person transfers ownership or
interest, the person may apply the unused portion of the credit to the
registration of any other vehicle owned by the person. Any unused
portion of such a credit expires on the date the registration of the
vehicle from which the person transferred the registration was due
to expire.
6. If the license plate or plates are not appropriate for the
second vehicle, the plate or plates must be surrendered to the
Department or registered dealer and an appropriate plate or plates
must be issued by the Department. The Department shall not reissue
the surrendered plate or plates until the next succeeding licensing
period.
7. If application for transfer of registration is not made within
60 days after the destruction or transfer of ownership of or interest
in any vehicle, the license plate or plates must be surrendered to the
Department on or before the 60th day for cancellation of the
registration.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
371.040, NRS 482.2155, subsections 8 and 9 of NRS 482.260 and
subsection 3 of NRS 482.483, if a person cancels his or her
registration and surrenders to the Department the license plates for a
vehicle, the Department shall:
(a) In accordance with the provisions of subsection 9, issue to
the person a refund of the portion of the registration fee and
governmental services tax paid on the vehicle attributable to the
remainder of the current calendar year or registration period on a pro
rata basis; or
(b) If the person does not qualify for a refund in accordance with
the provisions of subsection 9, issue to the person a credit in the
amount of the portion of the registration fee and governmental
services tax paid on the vehicle attributable to the remainder of the
current calendar year or registration period on a pro rata basis. Such
-
*AB525*

– 8 –
a credit may be applied by the person to the registration of any other
vehicle owned by the person. Any unused portion of the credit
expires on the date the registration of the vehicle from which the
person obtained a refund was due to expire.
9. The Department shall issue a refund pursuant to subsection 8
only if the request for a refund is made at the time the registration is
cancelled and the license plates are surrendered, the person
requesting the refund is a resident of Nevada, the amount eligible
for refund exceeds $100, and evidence satisfactory to the
Department is submitted that reasonably proves the existence of
extenuating circumstances. For the purposes of this subsection, the
term “extenuating circumstances” means circumstances wherein:
(a) The person has recently relinquished his or her driver’s
license and has sold or otherwise disposed of his or her vehicle.
(b) The vehicle has been determined to be inoperable and the
person does not transfer the registration to a different vehicle.
(c) The owner of the vehicle is seriously ill or has died and the
guardians or survivors have sold or otherwise disposed of the
vehicle.
(d) Any other event occurs which the Department, by regulation,
has defined to constitute an “extenuating circumstance” for the
purposes of this subsection.
Sec. 6. NRS 482.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
482.500 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 or 3
or specifically provided by statute, whenever upon application any
duplicate or substitute certificate of registration, indicator, decal or
number plate is issued, the following fees must be paid:

For a certificate of registration ........................................ $5.00
For every substitute number plate or set of plates ............. 5.00
For every duplicate number plate or set of plates ............ 10.00
For every decal displaying a county name ...................... .50
For every other indicator, decal, license plate sticker
or tab............................................................................. 5.00

2. The following fees must be paid for any replacement
number plate or set of plates issued for the following special license
plates:
(a) For any special plate issued pursuant to NRS 482.3667,
482.367002, 482.3672, 482.370 to 482.3755, inclusive, 482.376 or
482.379 to 482.3818, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, a fee of
$10.
(b) For any special plate issued pursuant to NRS 482.368,
482.3765, 482.377 or 482.378, a fee of $5.
-
*AB525*

– 9 –
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (a) of subsection
1 of NRS 482.3824, for any souvenir license plate issued pursuant
to NRS 482.3825 or sample license plate issued pursuant to NRS
482.2703, a fee equal to that established by the Director for the
issuance of those plates.
3. A fee must not be charged for a duplicate or substitute of a
decal issued pursuant to NRS 482.37635.
4. The fees which are paid for replacement number plates,
duplicate number plates and decals displaying county names must
be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Motor Vehicle
Fund and allocated to the Department to defray the costs of
replacing or duplicating the plates and manufacturing the decals.
Sec. 7. NRS 445B.760 is hereby amended to read as follows:
445B.760 1. The Commission may by regulation prescribe
standards for exhaust emissions, fuel evaporative emissions and
visible emissions of smoke from mobile internal combustion
engines on the ground or in the air, including, but not limited to,
aircraft, motor vehicles, snowmobiles and railroad locomotives. The
regulations must provide for the exemption from such standards of:
(a) A moped registered pursuant to NRS 482.2155; and
(b) A vehicle for which special license plates have been issued
pursuant to NRS 482.381, 482.3812, 482.3814 or 482.3816 or
section 1 of this act if the owner of such a vehicle certifies to the
Department of Motor Vehicles, on a form provided by the
Department of Motor Vehicles, that the vehicle was not driven more
than 5,000 miles during the immediately preceding year.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, standards for
exhaust emissions which apply to a:
(a) Reconstructed vehicle, as defined in NRS 482.100; and
(b) Trimobile, as defined in NRS 482.129,
 must be based on standards which were in effect in the year in
which the engine of the vehicle was built.
3. A trimobile that meets the definition of a motorcycle in 40
C.F.R. § 86.402-78 or 86.402-98, as applicable, is not subject to
emissions standards under this chapter.
4. Any such standards which pertain to motor vehicles must be
approved by the Department of Motor Vehicles before they are
adopted by the Commission.
Sec. 8. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 7, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
-
*AB525*

– 10 –
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB525*